Maine, session 132, LD1333.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §850-A, sub-§9, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§7, is amended to read:
A. Earned at least 6 times the state average weekly wage in wages subject to premiums
under this subchapter during the individual's base period or elects coverage and meets
the requirements of section 850‑G; and
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §850-A, sub-§9, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§7, is amended to read:
B. Meets the administrative requirements outlined in this subchapter and any rules
adopted pursuant to this subchapter and files an application for family leave benefits
or medical leave benefits.; and
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §850-A, sub-§9, ¶C is enacted to read:
C. Has been employed for at least 120 days by the employer from whom the employee
is taking leave.
Sec. 4. 26 MRSA §850-A, sub-§27, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7,
is amended to read:
27. Self-employed individual. "Self-employed individual" means an independent
contractor as described in section 1043, subsection 11, paragraph E, a sole proprietor, or a
member of a limited liability company or limited liability partnership, if the contractor,
proprietor, limited liability company or limited liability partnership has fewer than 15
employees, or an individual whose net profit or loss from a business must be reported to
the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of Revenue Services and
who resides in the State.
Sec. 5. 26 MRSA §850-B, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. ZZZ, §4, is
further amended to read:
5. Intermittent leave requirements. Leave permitted by this section may be taken
by an employee intermittently in increments equaling not less than one day, or on a reduced
leave schedule otherwise agreed to by the employee and the employer, except that the
employee and employer may not agree for leave to be taken in increments of less than one
hour. The taking of leave intermittently or on a reduced leave schedule pursuant to this
subsection may not result in a reduction in the total amount of leave to which the covered
individual is entitled under this subchapter. The administrator shall review requests by an
employer to review the intermittent leave schedules used by employees. An employer may
make no more than 2 requests per year.
Sec. 6. 26 MRSA §850-B, sub-§10, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA,
§7, is amended to read:
D. Require a public employer, as defined in section 962, subsection 7, or employee of
a public an employer that is a party to a collective bargaining agreement in existence
on the effective date of this subchapter October 25, 2023 to apply any of the rights and
responsibilities under this subchapter until the existing collective bargaining agreement
expires.
Page 1 - 132LR2045(01)

Sec. 7. 26 MRSA §850-B, sub-§11, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7,
is amended to read:
11. Concurrent with leave under state and federal law. Leave taken under this
subchapter runs concurrently with leave taken under the federal Family and Medical Leave
Act of 1993, 29 United States Code, Section 2611, et seq., and under subchapter 6‑A.
Employees may take leave under this subchapter while ineligible for leave under the federal
Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 in the same benefit year. An employee may not
take leave under this subchapter unless leave available to the employee under the federal
Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 is taken concurrently.
Sec. 8. 26 MRSA §850-D, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is
amended to read:
2. Filing of application. An individual may file an application for family leave
benefits or medical leave benefits no more than 60 days before the anticipated start date of
family leave and medical leave and no more than 90 30 days after the start date of family
leave and medical leave. The administrator shall waive the 90-day 30-day filing deadline
for good cause. The administrator shall institute forms and procedures that are not unduly
burdensome to an individual claiming benefits.
Sec. 9. 26 MRSA §850-D, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is
amended to read:
3. Notification of employer. The administrator shall notify the relevant employer
within 5 business days of a claim being filed pursuant to this subchapter. The administrator
shall also notify the relevant employer within 5 business days of a claim being approved.
Sec. 10. 26 MRSA §850-F, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7,
is amended to read:
2. Employer to remit employer contribution reports and premiums. Beginning
January 1, 2025, for each employee, an employer shall remit employer contribution reports
and premiums in the form and manner determined by the administrator. Employer
contribution reports and premiums must be remitted quarterly. The department shall post
on its publicly accessible website no later than February 1st of each year the dates by which
contribution reports and premiums must be remitted.
Sec. 11. 26 MRSA §850-F, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7,
is amended to read:
5. Employers. The following provisions govern employers.
A. An employer with 15 or more employees may deduct up to 50% of the premium
required for an employee by subsection 3 from that employee's wages and shall remit
100% of the combined premium contribution required by subsection 3 to the fund. An
employer subject to a collective bargaining agreement is not required to bargain the
decision to deduct up to 50% of the premium required from an employee's wage.
B. An employer with fewer than 15 employees may deduct up to 50% of the premium
required for an employee by subsection 3 from that employee's wages and shall remit
50% of the premium required by subsection 3 to the fund.
Page 2 - 132LR2045(01)

An employer that deducts a portion of the premium from employee wages may collect any
missed or incorrect deductions in any of the succeeding 8 payment periods as long as the
collection occurs within 3 months of the missed or incorrect deduction. For the purposes
of determining liability for premiums, an employer with 15 or more employees on the
employer's established payroll in 52 calendar workweeks in the 12-month period preceding
September 30th of each year is considered an employer of 15 or more employees for the
calendar year thereafter. For the purpose of calculating the number of employees, the
method used defaults to the mechanism established for determining unemployment
insurance liability as described in chapter 13.
Sec. 12. 26 MRSA §850-F, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7,
is amended to read:
9. Failure or refusal to make premium contributions. An employer that fails or
refuses to make premium contributions as required in this section must may be assessed
1.0% of its total annual payroll for each year it so failed to comply in addition to any
amounts previously owed, or fraction thereof, in addition to the total amount of family
leave benefits and medical leave benefits paid to covered individuals for whom it failed to
make premium contributions. The rate of assessment imposed by this subsection must be
adjusted annually consistent with subsection 3, paragraph B. The department shall exercise
discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount of any such payments if the recovery
would be against equity and good conscience.
Sec. 13. 26 MRSA §850-G, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7,
is amended to read:
1. Self-employed individual. A self-employed individual, including an independent
contractor, sole proprietor or partner, may elect coverage under this subchapter for an initial
period of not less than 3 years. The self-employed individual shall file a notice of election
in writing with the commissioner, as required by the department. The election becomes
effective on the date of filing the notice. As a condition of election, the self-employed
individual must agree to supply any information concerning wages that the department
considers necessary. Notwithstanding section 850-F, subsection 4, a self-employed
individual electing coverage for the first time must pay 1/4 of one year's worth of premiums
as a condition of enrollment.
Sec. 14. 26 MRSA §850-H, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7,
is amended to read:
7. Cost of administration. The department shall annually determine the total amount
expended by the department for costs arising out of the administration of private plans. An
employer offering a private plan pursuant to this section shall reimburse the department for
the costs arising out of the private plan in the amount, form and manner determined by the
department by rule. The department may recover reasonable expenses incurred by the
department for the oversight of private plans by assessing a renewal fee on each employer
offering a private plan. The renewal fee may not exceed $250 for an employer with fewer
than 50 employees and $500 for an employer with 50 or more employees. The department
shall transfer payments received pursuant to this subsection to the fund. The department
shall report to the authority annually the amount of money collected pursuant to this
subsection in the preceding year.
Page 3 - 132LR2045(01)

Sec. 15. 26 MRSA §850-H, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Department to post documents required from employers. The department shall
post on its publicly accessible website the appropriate tax forms, based on guidance from
the United States Internal Revenue Service and the Department of Administrative and
Financial Services, Maine Revenue Services, that employers with approved private plans
must provide to employees taking leave.
Sec. 16. 26 MRSA §850-J, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7,
is amended to read:
1. Restoration to position upon return to work. Except for an employee who has
not been employed for at least 120 days, an An employee who exercises the right to family
leave or medical leave under this subchapter is entitled, upon return from that leave, to be
restored by the employer to the position held by the employee when the leave commenced
or to be restored to an equivalent position with equivalent employment benefits, pay and
other terms and conditions of employment. This subsection does not apply to an employee
who is absent from work for more than 5 days without providing notice to the employer.
Sec. 17. 26 MRSA §850-Q, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is amended
to read:
§850-Q. Rulemaking
The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this subchapter. Initial
rules necessary for implementation of this subchapter must be adopted by the department
by January 1, 2025. Rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter are routine technical major
substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 18. 26 MRSA §850-R, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
§850-R. Effect of existing employer benefits for family and medical leave
This subchapter may not be construed to prohibit:
1. Receipt of benefits pursuant to agreement or policy. An employee entitled to
receive benefits for family leave or medical leave under a collective bargaining agreement
or employer policy from also receiving benefits under this subchapter as long as the
employee is otherwise eligible for benefits under this subchapter; or
2. Reduction of benefits to not exceed weekly wage. An employer under a collective
bargaining agreement from reducing total benefits, including benefits under this
subchapter, so that benefits do not exceed 100% of the employee's average weekly wage.